dictsource/cs_rules
// translation rules for Czech
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
        a        a
        au       aU

     m) ai (l    eI
     p) age      eIdZ
     p) aste (_  eIst
    tr) ack      ek


.group á
        á        a:

.group ä
        ä        e

.group b
        b        b
        b (_     p
        b (_G    b
        bě       bje

        back     bek
        basic    beIzik
        board    bo:rd


.group c
        c        ts
        ch       x

     _) c (al    k
     _) c (lau   k
     _) c (om    k
     _) c (or    k
     _) creati   kreati
   _ma) c (r     k
   _pa) ck (a    k
    re) cogni (t kogni
    _s) ca (n    ke
    _s) c (o     k
        cover    kavr-
        c (us    k
    lo) ck       k
    pa) ck       k
   pas) c (al    k
    re) c (o     k
        ctrl     kont@-*ol


.group č
        č        tS

.group d
        d        d
        d (_     t
        d (_G    d
        d (ě     J
        d (i     J
        d (í     J
        d (iT    d     // word has $alt attribute
        d (íT    d
        dz       dz
        dz (_    ts
        dz (_G   dz
        dž       dZ
        dž (_    tS
        dž (_G   dZ


.group di
        di (a    di
        di (e_   dij
        di (e    di
        di (gi   di
        di (j    di
        di (k    di
        di (o    di
        di (r    di
        di (u    di
        di (scip di
        diskredi  disk@-*edi
        di (sk   di
        di (sp   di
        disti (c  disti
        di (st   di
   _au) di       di
     _) di (a    dij
     _) di (á    di
     _) di (ch   di
     _) dick     dik
     _) di (f    di
     _) di (g    di
     _) di (let  di
     _) di (me   di
     _) di (mi   di
     _) di (p    di
     _) di (rc   Ji
     _) di (rk   Ji
     _) disco    disko
     _) di (s    di
     _) di (van  di
     _) di (ver  di
     _) di (vid  di
     _) di (vizna Ji
     _) di (vizny Ji
     _) di (z    di
   cho) di (s    Ji
    _e) di       di
 _expe) di       di
  _gla) di       di
  _hle) di       Ji
  _kar) di       di
   _mo) di       di
   _ne) di (p    di
    _o) di (nst  di
  _pol) di       di
  _sar) di       di
 _scan) di       di
  _tra) di       di
     a) di (k    di
    an) di (d    di
   dar) di (z    di
   eto) di       di
        di (a_   di
        di (e_   dij
        di (i_   dij
        di (o_   dij
        di (u_   dij
        di (nik  di
        di (sm   di
        di (st   di
        di (tik  di
        di (um_  di
    in) di       di
    ko) di (fi   di
   kre) di (t    di
    la) di (s    di
   man) di (t    di
    me) di       di
    mé) di       di
    mě) di       di
    mi) di       di
     n) di (c    di
     o) di (c    di
    or) di       di
   ral) di       di
    ře) di (sk   Ji
   rio) di (c    di
  tope) di (c    di
   tra) di (c    di


.group ď
        ď        J
        ď (_     c
        ď (_G    J

.group e
        e        e
        ej (K    eI
        eu       eU

     k) ey       i:


.group é
        é        e:

.group ě
        ě        e

.group f
        f        f
        fě       fje

.group g
        g        g
        g (_     k
        g (_G    g


.group h
        h        h
        h (_     x
        h (_G    h

.group i
        i        i
        ia       %ia
        ie       %ie
        iu       %iu

        ia (_    ia
        ie (_    ije
        ii (_    iji
        io (_    ijo
        iu (_    iju
     _) i (on    j

     C) ight     ajt   // right, night


.group í
        í        i:

.group j
        j        j

.group k
        k        k
        kk       k

.group l
        l        l
        ll       l
     K) l (K     l-

     _) laser    leIzr


.group ľ
        ľ        l^

.group m
        m        m
        mě       mn^e

     _) manager  menedZr-
     _) message  mesidZ
     _) mic (ro  majk


.group n
        n        n
        nn       n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N
        n (ě     n^
        n (i     n^
        n (í     n^
        n (iT    n    // word has $alt attribute
        n (íT    n

        new      n^u:


.group ni
    _a) ni (m    ni
anorga) ni       ni
 _bota) ni       ni
  _bro) ni       n^i
   _cy) ni       ni
  _ebo) ni       ni
   _et) ni (c    ni
_galva) ni       ni
 _huma) ni       ni
_hygie) ni       ni
  _imu) ni (t    ni
   _ka) ni (b    ni
 _kolo) ni       ni
_mícha) ni       n^i
   _mo) ni       ni
   _mu) ni       ni
   _na) ni (tr   ni
     _) nikoti   nikoti
     _) ni (l    ni
     _) ni (tro  ni
     _) ni (tro_ n^i
 _orga) ni       ni
   _pa) ni (ck   ni
   _sa) ni (t    ni
   _se) ni (l    ni
   _te) ni (s    ni
  _tré) ni       ni
    _u) ni       ni
   ale) ni (t    ni
     a) ni (d    ni
     a) ni (kov  ni
     a) ni (k    ni
     a) ni (z    ni
   cha) ni (c    ni
   cha) ni (k    ni
    či) ni (t    n^i
    do) ni (c    ni
  echa) ni (s    ni
   efi) ni       ni
   ele) ni (t    ni
 endro) ni       ni
     e) ni (k    ni
     e) ni (s    ni
 eremo) ni       ni
  erma) ni       ni
    fi) niti     niti
    fo) ni (c    ni
    ge) ni       ni
    gé) ni       ni
     g) ni (t    ni
    go) ni       ni
 harmo) ni       ni
     i) ni (k    ni
        ni (a_   ni
        ni (e_   nij
        ni (i_   nij
        ni (o_   nij
        ni (u_   nij
        ni (nik  ni
        ni (sm   ni
        ni (st   ni
        ni (tik  ni
        ni (um_  ni
     i) ni (ci   ni
     i) ni (t    ni
  _hli) ni (t    n^i
   iro) ni       ni
   kli) ni       ni
     k) ni (p    ni
  komu) ni       ni
   kto) ni       ni
  loud) ni       n^i
    ma) ni (f    ni
    ma) ni (p    ni
    mi) ni       ni
    mu) ni (k    ni
    mu) ni (s    ni
 námoř) ni       n^i
    na) ni (s    ni
        ni (ak   ni
        ni (í    nij
        ni (kl   ni
        ni (zuj  ni
    no) ni (m    ni
     o) ni (d    ni
     o) ni (k    ni
     o) ni (s    ni
   pod) ni (k    n^i
   pro) ni (k    n^i
    ro) ni (c    ni
  stoj) ni       n^i
  tago) ni (s    ni
    tu) ni (s    ni
     u) ni (k    n^i
     u) ni (t    ni
    vi) ni (t    n^i
     v) ni (kl   n^i
    vz) ni (k    n^i
    za) ni (k    n^i
    ze) ni (t    ni


.group ň
        ň        n^

.group o
        o        o
        ou       oU

     v) oice     ojs
     t) oo (l    u:
    gr) ou (p    u:
 _wind) ow       oU


.group ó
        ó        o:

.group ô
        ô        uo

.group p
        p        p
        pp (A_   p
        pě       pje

.group q
        q        kv
        qu       kv

.group r
//        r        r
//     A) r (A     *
//     C) r (A     @-*
//        rr       *r
//        right    rajt
       K) r (K     r-

        r        R
        rr       R
        right    Rajt


.group ř
        ř        R^
     p) ř        R^/   // quieter after unvoiced consonant
     f) ř        R^/
     t) ř        R^/
     k) ř        R^/

.group s
        s        s
        ss (_    s
        ss (A_   s

        scape    skeIp
        shift    Sift
  _pre) s (id    z
        selec (t silek
        space    speIs
     e) s (id    z


.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t
        tt (_    t
        tt (A_   t
        t (ě     c
        t (i     c
        t (í     c
        t (iT    t       // word has $alt attribute
        t (íT    t

.group ti
   _an) ti       ti
_atlan) ti       ti
  _bes) ti       ti
  _cen) ti       ti
 _dese) ti       ci
_dvace) ti       ci
_eklip) ti       ti
  _flo) ti       ti
  _ins) ti       ti
  _jus) ti       ti
 _kons) ti       ti
  _kon) ti (n    ti
_kosme) ti       ti
   _ky) ti (c    ci
   _ma) ti (n    ci
  _mul) ti       ti
   _op) ti (c    ti
_pales) ti       ti
   _pe) ti (č    ti
  _pla) ti (n    ti
 _posi) ti       ti
_preven) ti      ti
  _pro) ti       ci
  _res) ti (t    ti
   _ru) ti       ti
   _sa) ti (r    ti
   _sa) ti (ř    ti
  _sen) ti       ti
  _sta) tisti    tisti
_stras) ti       ci
   _tě) ti       ci
 _téma) ti       ti
     _) ti (b    ti
     _) ti (ci   ti
     _) ti (mb   ti
     _) time     tajm
        time (_  tajm
     _) ti (nk   ti
     _) ti (ran  ti
     _) ti (tan  ti
     _) ti (tán  ti
     _) ti (tul  ti
     _) ti (x    ti
  _ver) ti (k    ti
    ak) ti       ti
   ama) ti (c    ti
   ama) ti (k    ti
    an) ti (k    ti
    an) ti (l    ti
    an) ti (s    ti
   apa) ti (c    ti
   apa) ti (č    ti
    ap) ti (v    ci
  arke) ti (ng   ti
 aroma) ti       ti
     a) ti (c    ti
     a) ti (k    ti
     a) ti (n    ti
     a) tisti    tisti
     a) ti (v    ti
     a) ti (z    ti
    au) ti       ti
    ás) ti (c    ci
    bo) ti (z    ti
   cha) ti (c    ci
     c) ti       ci
  desá) ti       ci
   des) ti (l    ti
   dos) ti       ci
 drama) ti       ti
    dr) ti       ci
    ek) ti       ti
   ema) ti (c    ti
   ema) ti (k    ti
    en) ti (n    ti
  eore) ti (c    ti
    ep) ti (k    ti
   ero) ti (c    ti
     e) ti (c    ti
     e) ti (k    ti
     e) ti (v    ti
     e) ti (z    ti
   eví) ti       ci
     ě) ti (c    ci
    gi) ti (m    ti
     i) ti (k    ti
        ti (a_   ti
        ti (e_   tij
        ti (i_   tij
        ti (o_   tij
        ti (u_   tij
        ti (nik  ti
        ti (sm   ti
        ti (st   ti
        ti (tik  ti
        ti (um_  ti
   hos) ti       ci
    in) ti (m    ti
  nves) ti       ti
   kon) ti       ti
   kos) ti (c    ci
   kri) ti       ti
     k) ti (v    ti
    la) ti (n    ci
  lech) ti       ci
    li) ti (c    ti
    ma) ti (ck   ti
    ma) ti (c    ci
    ma) ti (ka   ti
    mo) ti (v    ti
    ms) ti       ci
    ne) ti (c    ti
     n) ti (c    ti
     n) ti (n    ti
  ompa) ti (b    ti
    op) ti       ti
    or) ti (m    ti
    os) ti (c    ti
     o) ti (k    ti
    pě) ti       ci
   ple) ti       ci
    ře) ti (c    ci
  řice) ti       ci
  rimi) ti (v    ti
    ri) ti (c    ti
    ri) ti (k    ti
    rk) ti       ti
    ro) ti (k    ti
    ro) ti (v    ci
     r) ti (z    ti
   rvi) ti       ti
   šes) ti       ci
     s) ti (k    ti
     s) ti (mul  ti
     s) ti (p    ti
 suges) ti       ti
        ti (ck   ti
        ti (f    ti
        timoni (t timoni
        tini (u  tinij
        ti (tul  ti
  toma) ti (c    ti
   uma) ti (c    ti
     u) ti (k    ti
  vani) ti (t    ti
   ven) ti (l    ti
    vě) ti (v    ci
    xo) ti (k    ti
     x) ti (l    ti
  ympa) ti       ti
     ý) ti (ck   ti
_flegma) ti      ti
   _ul) ti (m    ti
  _abs) ti       ti
   kul) ti (v    ti


.group ť
        ť        c

.group u
        u        u

.group ú
        ú        u:

.group ů
        ů        u:

.group v
        v        v
        vě       vje

.group w
        w        v
        wave     veIf

.group x
        x        ks
     e) xoti (c  gzoti

.group y
        y        i
        y (í     ij

.group ý
        ý        i:

.group z
        z        z
        z (_     s
        z (_G    z

.group ž
        ž        Z
        ž (_     S
        ž (_G    Z

.group
        ä        e
        ë        e
        ĺ        l-
        ö        e:
        ŕ        r-
        ü        i

	$	dola:R
	:	dv'ojtetSka
	%	pRotsento
	+	plus
	€	eURo
	@	zavina:tS
	&	ampr-sent
	#	gR^i:Zek
	/	lomeno
	\\	beksleS
	!	vigR^itSn^i:k
	°	stupen^
	×	kRa:t
	÷	Jeleno
	§	paRagRaf
	~	tilda
	^	zdR^i:Ska
	©	k'opiRajt

        .        tetSka
        . (.     _:
   \.)  .

   __)  - (_D    mi:nus
   A_)  - (_D    _
   C_)  - (_D    _
    --) -

        *        hvj'ezJitSka
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
